Utah statutes.
16-4-206.   Service and publication of notice of assessment.

(1)  The notice of assessment required by Section 16-4-205 shall be:

(a)  personally served on each shareholder; or

(b)  sent by first-class mail to each shareholder at the address shown on the corporation's records.

(2)  A shareholder is responsible for providing the shareholder's current mailing address to the corporation for purposes of Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a notice of assessment shall be published:

(i)  once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the location of the corporation's principal place of business; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.

(b)  A water company may elect not to publish notice under Subsection (3)(a).



Amended by Chapter 388, 2009 General Session

